FST/hsi/phonetize_hsi_noun.xfst
define vowel ā|a|e|i|o|u;
define consonant b|c|č|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|p|q|r|ṛ|s|š|t|ʰ|v|w|x|y|z;

regex %+N -> "^",,
    %+non%{NOM%} -> 0,,
    %+PL -> PL1 || %+non%{NOM%} (%+FEM) _,,
    %+PL -> PL2 || %+NOM %+MASC _,,
    %+PL -> PL3 || %+NOM %+FEM _,,
    %+NOM -> 0,,
    %+SG -> 0,,
    %+MASC -> 0,,
    %+FEM -> 0,,
    %+PSS1S -> y,,
    %+PSS2S -> 0,,
    %+PSS3S -> s,,
    %+PSS1P -> m,,
    %+PSS2P -> m,,
    %+PSS3P -> ā n;
